Washington statutes.
RCW 5.24.010

Judicial notice of Constitution and laws.

Every court of this state shall take judicial notice of the Constitution, common law, civil law, and statutes of every state, territory and other jurisdiction of the United States.

[ 1941 c 82 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 1278.]